tr: Balıkçılık iğnesi çeşitleri dahil: Yemleme iğnesi; Boili iğnesi; Örgü iğnesi; Matkap; Mandallı iğne; Mandallı iğne; Ekleme iğnesi; Dizgi iğnesi; İplik geçirici; Diğer
fr: Types d’aiguilles de pêche inclus: Aiguille à appât; Aiguille à bouillettes; Aiguille pour tresse; Foret; Aiguille à chas articulé; Aiguille à loquet; Aiguille à épissure; Aiguille à chapelet; Enfile-aiguille; Autre
sk-SK: Zahrnuté typy rybárskych ihiel: Ihla na nástrahy; Ihla na boilies; Ihla na šnúry; Vrtáčik; Ihla so západkou; Ihla s klapkou; Prepájacia ihla; Ihla na stringery; Navliekač; Iné
pl: W zestawie różne rodzaje igieł wędkarskich: Igła do kulek/przynęt; Igła do kulek proteinowych; Igła do plecionki; Wiertełko; Igła z zapadką; Igła z zamkiem/zapadką; Igła do leadcore'u/splatania; Igła do nici rozpuszczalnych; Nawlekacz; Inne
cs: Zahrnuté typy rybářských jehel: Jehla na nástrahy; Jehla na boilies; Jehla na pletené šňůry; Vrtáček; Jehla se západkou; Jehla s háčkem; Pletací jehla; Navlékací jehla (stringer); Provlékač; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipos de agulhas de pesca incluídos: Agulha de iscar; Agulha de boilie; Agulha para multifilamento; Broca; Agulha com fecho; Agulha de lingueta; Agulha de emenda; Agulha stringer; Passador de fio; Outro
de: Enthaltene Arten von Angelnadeln: Ködernadel; Boilienadel; Geflecht-Nadel; Bohrer; Nadel mit Klappöse; Nadel mit Schließhaken; Spleißnadel; Stringernadel; Einfädler; Sonstige
ko: 낚시바늘 포함 유형: 베이팅 바늘; 보일리 바늘; 브레이드 바늘; 드릴; 게이트 바늘; 래치 바늘; 스플라이싱 바늘; 스트링거 바늘; 스레더; 기타
ro-RO: Tipuri de ace de pescuit incluse: Ac pentru nadă; Ac pentru boilies; Ac pentru fir textil; Burghiu; Ac cu clapetă; Ac cu închizător; Ac pentru împletit; Ac pentru stringer; Dispozitiv de înfilare; Altele
fi: Mukana toimitetut syöttineulatyypit: Syöttineula; Boilie-neula; Kuitusiimaneula; Pora; Suljettava neula; Salpaneula; Pleissausneula; Stringer-neula; Pujotin; Muu
da: Fiskenåltyper, der er inkluderet: Agnnål; Boilienål; Fletlinenål; Bor; Nål med lås; Låsenål; Splejsenål; Stringernål; Tråder; Andet
vi: Các loại kim câu cá đi kèm: Kim móc mồi; Kim móc boilie; Kim móc dây dù; Mũi khoan; Kim có chốt; Kim móc gài; Kim nối dây; Kim xâu chuỗi; Dụng cụ xỏ dây; Khác
el: Περιλαμβάνονται τύποι βελονών ψαρέματος: Βελόνα δολώματος; Βελόνα για boilie; Βελόνα νήματος; Τρυπανάκι; Βελόνα με κλείστρο; Βελόνα με άγκιστρο; Βελόνα ματίσματος; Βελόνα stringer; Περαστήρι; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipos de agulhas de pesca incluídos: Agulha para isca; Agulha para boilie; Agulha para trança; Broca; Agulha com fecho; Agulha com trava; Agulha para emenda; Agulha stringer; Passador de linha; Outros
hu: Mellékelt horgásztű típusok: Csalizótű; Bojlitű; Fonottzsinór-tű; Fúró; Záras tű; Kampós tű; Fűzőtű (splicing); Stringer tű; Befűző; Egyéb
th: มีเข็มตกปลาประเภทต่างๆ รวมอยู่ด้วย: เข็มร้อยเหยื่อ; เข็มร้อยบอยลี่; เข็มร้อยสายถัก; สว่านเจาะ; เข็มแบบมีตัวล็อก; เข็มแลตช์; เข็มต่อสาย; เข็มร้อยพวง; ที่ร้อยสาย; อื่นๆ
it: Tipi di aghi da pesca inclusi: Ago da innesco; Ago da boilie; Ago per trecciato; Trapanino; Ago con chiusura; Ago con linguetta; Ago per impiombature; Ago per stringer; Infila lenza; Altro
nl: Inbegrepen typen visnaalden: Aasnaald; Boilienaald; Braid-naald; Boortje; Lipnaald; Weerhaaknaald; Splitsnaald; Stringernaald; Draadsteker; Overige
ru: Типы рыболовных игл в комплекте: Игла для насадок; Игла для бойлов; Игла для плетенки; Сверло; Игла с замком; Игла с язычком; Игла для сплайсинга; Игла для стрингеров; Продеватель; Другое
ja: 釣り針タイプ付き: ベイティングニードル; ボイリーニードル; ブレイドニードル; ドリル; ゲートニードル; ラッチニードル; スプライシングニードル; ストリンガーニードル; スレッダー; その他
hr-HR: Uključene vrste igala za ribolov: Igla za mamčenje; Igla za boile; Igla za upredenicu; Svrdlo; Igla s vratancima; Igla s preklopom; Igla za uplitanje; Igla za nizanje; Alat za provlačenje; Ostalo
es: Tipos de de agujas de pesca incluidos: Aguja para cebo; Aguja para boilies; Aguja para trenzado; Taladro; Aguja con pestillo; Aguja de gancho; Aguja de empalme; Aguja stringer; Enhebrador; Otro
nb: Fiskenåltyper inkludert: Agnnål; Boilienål; Multifilamentnål; Bor; Nål med lås; Låsenål; Spleisenål; Stringernål; Trådtreder; Annet
sv: Typ av betesnål som ingår: Betesnål; Boilie-nål; Flätnål; Borr; Låsnål; Spärrnål; Skarvnål; Stringer-nål; Trädare; Övrigt
zh-TW: 內含釣魚穿線針類型: 穿餌針; 麵團餌針 / 圓球餌針; 編織線針; 鑽頭; 帶鎖針; 舌針 / 鎖扣針; 編接針; 串餌針; 穿線器; 其他
bg-BG: Включени типове риболовни игли: Игла за стръв; Игла за протеинови топчета; Игла за плетено влакно; Свредло; Игла с езиче; Игла с ключалка; Игла за сплитане; Игла за стрингер; Вдевачка; Друго
lt-LT: Įtraukti žvejybos adatų tipai: Masalo vėrimo adata; Boilių adata; Pinto valo adata; Grąžtas; Adata su užraktu; Adata su kabliuku; Supynimo adata; Girliandų adata; Vėriklis; Kita
sl-SI: Vključene vrste ribiških igel: Igla za vabe; Igla za bojlije; Igla za pletenico; Sveder; Igla z zapiralom; Igla z zatičem; Igla za spajanje; Igla za nizanje; Vdevalec; Drugo
zh-CN: 所含钓鱼针类型: 穿饵针; 饵球针; 编织针; 钻头; 带锁扣针; 舌针; 拼接针; 穿线针; 穿线器; 其他
en: Fishing needle types included: Baiting needle; Boilie needle; Braid needle; Drill; Gated needle; Latch needle; Splicing needle; Stringer needle; Threader; Other